Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 4. Conservation Officers.

§ 10.1-115.
Appointment of conservation officers; qualifications; oath.

The Director, when he deems it necessary, may request the Governor to commission an individual designated by the Director to act as a conservation officer of the Commonwealth. Upon concurring with the Director’s request, the Governor shall direct the Secretary of the Commonwealth to issue a conservation officer commission to the designated individual. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall deliver a copy of the commission to the Director. Any individual so commissioned shall hold his commission during his term of employment with the Department, subject to the provisions of §

10.1-118

.

The Director, upon the request of the Breaks Interstate Park Commission, may request the Governor to commission an individual who meets the requirements of §

10.1-120

and is designated by the Director to act as a conservation officer of the Commonwealth. Upon concurring with the Director’s request, the Governor shall direct the Secretary of the Commonwealth to issue a conservation officer commission to the designated individual. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall deliver a copy of the commission to the Director.

To be qualified to receive a conservation officer commission, a person shall (i) be at least 21 years of age and (ii) have graduated from high school or obtained an equivalent diploma.

Each conservation officer shall qualify before the clerk of the circuit court of the city or county in which he resides, or in which he first is assigned duty, by taking the oaths prescribed by law. An employee of the Breaks Interstate Park Commission shall qualify before the clerk of the circuit court of Dickenson County.

The Director may designate certain conservation officers to be special conservation officers. Special conservation officers shall have the same authority and power as sheriffs throughout the Commonwealth to enforce the laws of the Commonwealth.

History.

1994, c. 205; 2015, cc. 64, 489.

Cross references.

As to definition of law-enforcement officer, see §

9.1-101

. As to exception for conservation officers from minimum training standards, see §

9.1-113

.

As to the Line of Duty Act, see §

9.1-400

. As to Public Safety Medal of Valor Act, see §

9.1-800

et seq. As to malicious bodily injury to law-enforcement officers, etc., see §

18.2-51.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1994, c. 205, cl. 2 provides that all commissions or appointments of conservators of the peace pursuant to §

19.2-16

shall be null and void except for appointment of persons currently employed by the Department of Conservation and Recreation.
Any Commission or appointment issued pursuant to §

19.2-16

to persons currently employed by the Department of Conservation and Recreation shall continue in full force and effect until it is replaced by a conservation officer commission issued pursuant to §

10.1-115

or until the individual ceases to be employed by the Department.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 64 and 489 are identical, and deleted “of the Department” following “Director,” substituted “a conservation officer” for “conservation officers” in subsection A; added subsection B and redesignated former subsections B through D as subsections C through E; substituted “21” for “twenty-one” in subsection C; and added the second sentence to subsection D.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Arrest, § 4.

§ 10.1-116.
Jurisdiction of conservation officers.

Conservation officers shall have jurisdiction throughout the Commonwealth on all Department lands and waters and upon lands and waters under the management or control of the Department, on property of the United States government or a department or agency thereof on which the Commonwealth has concurrent jurisdiction and is contiguous with land of the Department or on which the Department has a management interest, on property operated by the Breaks Interstate Park Commission within the Commonwealth of Virginia with the written agreement of the Commission, on a property of another state agency or department whose property is contiguous with land of the Department, and in those local jurisdictions in which mutual aid agreements have been established pursuant to §

15.2-1736

.

Special conservation officers appointed pursuant to §

10.1-115

shall have jurisdiction throughout the Commonwealth.

History.

1994, c. 205; 2005, c. 87; 2015, cc. 64, 489.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 87 added “on a property . . . pursuant to §

15.2-1736

” to the end of the present first paragraph and added the second paragraph.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 64 and 489 are identical, and inserted “on property operated by the Breaks Interstate Park Commission within the Commonwealth of Virginia with the written agreement of the Commission” in the first paragraph and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 10.1-117.
Powers and duties of conservation officers.

It shall be the duty of all conservation officers to uphold and enforce the laws of the Commonwealth, the regulations of the Department, and the rules and regulations of the Breaks Interstate Park Commission.

Commissioned conservation officers shall be law-enforcement officers and shall have the power to enforce the laws of the Commonwealth, the regulations of the Department and the collegial bodies under administrative support of the Department, and the rules and regulations of the Breaks Interstate Park Commission. If requested by the chief law-enforcement officer of the locality, conservation officers shall coordinate the investigation of felonies with the local law-enforcement agency.

History.

1994, c. 205; 2005, c. 88; 2015, cc. 64, 489.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 88 deleted the former last sentence of subsection A; and, in subsection B, deleted “and conservators of the peace” following “law-enforcement officers,” and substituted “the power to enforce” for “all of the powers of a conservator of the peace as provided in Article 2 (§

19.2-18

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of Title 19.2 to enforce” in the first sentence, and rewrote the last sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 64 and 489 are identical, and deleted “and” following “laws of the Commonwealth” and inserted “and the rules and regulations of the Breaks Interstate Park Commission” at the end of subsection A and in the first sentence in subsection B.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Law-enforcement officers may inquire into immigration status. —

Virginia law-enforcement officers, including conservation officers, may inquire into the immigration status of persons stopped or arrested; however, persons tasked with enforcing zoning laws lack the authority to investigate criminal violations of the law, including criminal violations of the immigration laws of the United States. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert G. Marshall, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 10-047, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (7/30/10).

§ 10.1-118.
Decommissioning of conservation officers.

Upon separation from the Department or the Breaks Interstate Park Commission, incapacity, death, or other good cause, the Director may recommend in writing the decommissioning of any conservation officer to the Governor. Upon concurring with the Director’s request, the Governor shall direct the Secretary of the Commonwealth to issue a certificate of decommissioning to the conservation officer. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall deliver a copy of the certificate to the Director. Upon receipt of the decommissioning certificate, the Director shall ensure that the certificate is recorded at the office of the clerk of the circuit court of any city or county in which the individual took his oath of office.

History.

1994, c. 205; 2015, cc. 64, 489.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 64 and 489 are identical, and inserted “or the Breaks Interstate Park Commission” in the first sentence.

§ 10.1-119.
Defense of conservation officer of the Department prosecuted on criminal charges.

If any conservation officer shall be brought before any regulatory body, summoned before any grand jury, investigated by any other law-enforcement agency, or arrested or indicted or otherwise prosecuted on any charge arising out of any act committed in the discharge of his official duties, the Director may employ special counsel approved by the Attorney General to defend such officer. Upon a finding that (i) the officer did not violate a law or regulation resulting from the act that was the subject of the investigation and (ii) the officer will not be terminated from employment as the result of such act, the Director shall arrange for payment for the special counsel employed. The compensation for special counsel employed pursuant to this section shall, subject to the approval of the Attorney General, be paid out of the funds appropriated for the administration of the Department of Conservation and Recreation or the Breaks Interstate Park Commission as may be applicable.

History.

2007, c. 595; 2015, cc. 64, 489.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 64 and 489 are identical, and deleted “appointed by the Director” following “If any conservation officer” in the first sentence, substituted “arrange for payment” for “pay” in the second sentence and added “or the Breaks Interstate Park Commission as may be applicable” at the end.

§ 10.1-120.
Commissioning of Breaks Interstate Park Commission employees as conservation officers.

The Director shall ensure that an employee of the Breaks Interstate Park Commission whom the Commission recommends for commissioning as a conservation officer in accordance with subsection B of §

10.1-115

meets the minimum qualifications for law-enforcement officers set out in §

15.2-1705

, is subject to the minimum training standards set out in §

9.1-114

, abides by the Department’s law-enforcement in-service training requirements, and abides by the law-enforcement directives of the Department unless exceptions by the Department are granted in writing. For the purposes of law-enforcement directives, the Breaks Interstate Park shall be treated as a Virginia State Park.

The Commission shall bear the expenses associated with training and equipping a Commission employee as a conservation officer to Department standards unless the Department agrees otherwise.

History.

2015, cc. 64, 489.